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DTC P0335/ 13EngineSpeedSensorCircuit 1 (NECircuit)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The crankshaft position sensor in the engine control system contains signal plate and a pickup coil for TDC
signal.TheTDCsignalplatehas 1 toothon itsoutercircumference.TheTDCsignalsensorgenerates 1
signal for every engine revolution. The engine ECU detects the top dead center by the TDC signals.
The engine speed sensor in the engine control system contains signal plate and a pickup coil for NE signal.
The NE signal plate has 78 teeth and is mounted in the injection pump. The NE signal sensor generates 78
signals every 2 engine revolutions. The engine ECU detects the engine speed and cam lift position of the
injection pump. The engine ECU uses TDC signal and NE signals for injection timing control. The NE signal
is also used for injection volume control.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P0335/13

No NE signal to engine ECU for 0.5 sec. or more at 580 rpm or
more SOpenorshort inenginespeedsensorcircuit

E i dP0335/13
No NE signal to engine ECU for 2.0 sec. or more during crank-
ing

SEnginespeedsensor
SEngineECU

Reference: INSPECTIONUSINGOSCILLOSCOPE
During cranking or idling, check between terminals NE+ and
NE− of theengineECU.
HINT:
The correct waveforms are as shown.
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WIRING DIAGRAM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkresistanceofenginespeedsensor (SeePubNo.RM6 17E,FU −113).

NG Check and replace injection pump
(SeePubNo.RM6 17E,FU −113).

OK
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2 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
engine speed sensor (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

3 Inspect sensor installation.

NG Tighten sensor.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN−1 9) .


